District of Columbia statutes.
26-314

License for limited station.

Any licensee may open and maintain, within the District, one or more limited stations for the purpose of cashing checks for the particular group or groups specified in the license authorizing each limited station. A separate license shall be issued for each limited station maintained by the same licensee. The stations shall be licensed in accordance with all of the provisions of this chapter applicable to licensees, and the applicant shall pay a non-refundable limited station license application fee of $150 for each limited station. Such fee may be changed in the rules and regulations promulgated by the Superintendent [Commissioner] as he or she deems necessary.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 15, 45 DCR 1782
This section is referenced in § 26-305.
1981 Ed., § 26-1114.